Utah statutes.
26-49-103.   Applicability to volunteer health practitioners.

This chapter applies to volunteer health practitioners who:

(1)  are registered with a registration system that complies with Section 26-49-202; and

(2)  provide health or veterinary services in Utah for a host entity while an emergency declaration is in effect.

